California statutes. Military and Veterans Code
(3) Three representatives from local veterans’ service organizations, appointed by the secretary.

(4) At least two members from the department.

(b) In recognition of the fact that the Endowment Fund will be made up largely of private and local funds, the department shall seek the advice of the Advisory Committee when considering significant changes in the design of the veterans cemetery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 130, Sec. 1.   (AB 2963)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1451.

(a) The California Central Coast State Veterans Cemetery at Fort Ord Endowment Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. Moneys in the Endowment Fund shall be allocated, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the department for the nonreimbursable costs of design and construction and the annual operations and maintenance costs of the veterans cemetery for the next 10 years.

(b) Moneys in the fund may be invested to generate earnings to offset annual operations and maintenance costs associated with the veterans cemetery.

(c) (1) The Endowment Fund may consist of donations from public and private entities, partnerships between public and private entities, fees, cash advances,
 and transfers from the state General Fund as may be specified by law.

(2) The department may enter into any financial agreement to receive cash advances in the Endowment Fund, provided that the agreement does not require the state to repay or make payments on cash advances and the agreement is reviewed and approved by the Department of Finance.

(d) To the extent possible, donations made in-kind to the Endowment Fund shall be monetized so as to offset the ongoing operations and maintenance costs under Sections 1452 and 1453.

(e) Earnings generated by the Endowment Fund shall be retained by the fund.

(f) Moneys deposited in the Endowment Fund are exempt from the requirements of Article 2 (commencing with Section 11270) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 3
 of the Government Code.

(g) Moneys in the Endowment Fund shall be invested by the Treasurer, after consultation with the department, in a manner that best meets the goals of the fund.

(h) If, through changes in state or federal law, additional revenues are identified for the operations and maintenance of the cemetery, including increases in federal burial allowances, so that the amount of annual revenue exceeds the annual operations and maintenance costs, the excess revenues shall be deposited in the Endowment Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 163.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1453.

(a) (1) The Controller, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall transfer moneys from the Endowment Fund to the Operations Fund in an amount equal to the estimated costs of developing and submitting
 a State Veterans Cemetery Grant Program application to the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.

(2) The Controller, upon appropriation by the Legislature, shall transfer funds from the Endowment Fund to the Operations Fund in an amount at least equal to the estimated costs to complete preliminary plans and working drawings. Transfers shall be made only when sufficient funds, as determined by the Director of Finance, exist to fully accomplish each of these project
 phases.

(b) (1) The Secretary of Veterans Affairs is authorized to act as the official representative of the state in connection with the State Veterans Cemetery Grant Program application, including
 providing the United States Department of Veterans Affairs throughout the application process with all necessary assurances that additional information shall be provided when required. The Secretary of Veterans Affairs shall have final approval of all aspects of the cemetery design and operation.

(2) Upon transfer of funds pursuant to paragraphs
 (1) and (2) of subdivision (a), the department is authorized to proceed with all activities necessary to support the submission of the State Veterans Cemetery Grant Program application.

(3) Upon the United States Department of Veterans Affairs’ certification of the grant award, the department is authorized to proceed with construction and equipping of the veterans cemetery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 135, Sec. 2.   (SB 949)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1454.

(a) The Central Coast Veterans Cemetery Master Development Fund is hereby renamed the California Central Coast State Veterans Cemetery at Fort Ord Operations Fund. Moneys in the Operations Fund may be transferred, upon appropriation by the Legislature, from the Endowment Fund to the Operations Fund for expenditure by the department, solely for the annual operations and maintenance costs of the veterans
 cemetery.

(b) (1) The Controller shall reserve an amount, not to exceed 20 percent of the amount allocated pursuant to subdivision (a), in the Operations Fund, which shall be used solely as a reserve for unforeseen operations and maintenance costs.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “unforeseen operations and maintenance costs” means any costs that could not have been reasonably anticipated by the department when preparing its estimate of annual operations and maintenance costs and that are needed to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 694, Sec. 5.   (SB 232)   Effective October 10, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1455.

(a) Subsequent to the department’s submission of the State Veterans Cemetery Grant Program application, pursuant to Section 1453, the department shall adopt regulations to specify the eligibility requirements for interment, the appropriate fees to be charged for interment or burial of spouses and dependent children of honorably discharged veterans, and appropriate fees for the disinterment of remains.

(b) Those eligible for interment are all honorably discharged veterans and their spouses and dependent children.

(c) All fees received pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deposited in the Endowment Fund created pursuant to Section 1451.

(d) Regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall also be applicable to all state-operated veterans cemeteries in order to ensure consistent and equitable treatment of all veterans and their families throughout the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 450, Sec. 7.   (AB 1757)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1456.

(a) Proposals for the construction, placement, or donation of monuments or memorials, excluding headstones, and other amenities to the veterans cemetery shall be subject to review by the California Central Coast Veterans Cemetery Advisory Committee.

(b) All proposals for the construction, placement, or donation of monuments, memorials, and
 amenities to the veterans cemetery shall be subject to the approval of the Secretary of Veterans Affairs.

(c) The department shall adopt regulations for the policies and procedures to be followed with respect to the design, placement, and approval of monuments and memorials proposed to be placed on veterans cemetery grounds.

(d) Endowment Fund balances exceeding that determined to be sufficient to meet annual operations and maintenance costs, as determined pursuant to Section 1453, may be expended, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purpose of establishing monuments, memorials, and amenities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 694, Sec. 6.   (SB 232)   Effective October 10, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1457.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 11005 of the Government Code, the veterans cemetery administrator may, subject to the approval of the Secretary of Veterans Affairs, accept donations of personal property, including cash or other gifts, to be used for the maintenance or beautification of the veterans cemetery.

(b) Donations in the form of cash shall
 be deposited in the Endowment Fund and shall be expended for the maintenance and repair of the veterans cemetery or for a specified veterans cemetery maintenance or beautification project designated by the donor, upon appropriation by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 450, Sec. 9.   (AB 1757)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10.5. State Veterans Cemeteries Fee Waiver [1480. - 1480.]

1480.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the fee for the interment of the spouses or children of eligible veterans in a cemetery operated under this division may be waived if the cemetery administrator determines that the families of the spouses or children do not have sufficient means to pay for the costs of interment.

(b) Any costs for the interment of the spouses or children of eligible veterans who received a waiver pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be paid from nonstate funds.

(c) The cemetery administrator shall seek reimbursements, if any are available, from federal, county, and other local agencies to offset any fees lost as a result of the waiver authorized pursuant to
 subdivision (a).

(d) The cemetery administrator may solicit private donations to offset any fees lost as a result of the waiver authorized pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 589, Sec. 1.   (SB 469)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 7. NATIONAL DEFENSE [1630. - 1693.]



CHAPTER 2. Sabotage Prevention Act of 1950 [1630. - 1674.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions and Definitions [1630. - 1640.]

1630.

This chapter may be cited as the Sabotage Prevention Act of 1950.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1631.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions and general provisions set forth in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1632.

“Highway” includes any private or public street, way, or other place used for travel to or from property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1633.

“Highway commissioners” means any board or other body having authority to restrict or close any highway to public use and travel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1634.

“Public utility” includes any pipeline, gas, electric, heat, water, sewer, telephone, telegraph, radio, television, railway, railroad, airplane, transportation, communication, or other system, by whomsoever owned or operated for public use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1635.

“War” means any of the following:

(a) Whenever Congress has declared war, and peace has not been formally restored.

(b) Whenever the United States is engaged in active military operations against any foreign power, whether or not war has been formally declared.

(c) Whenever the United States is assisting the United Nations, in actions involving the use of armed force, to restore international peace and security.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1636.

“Defense preparation” means any of the following:

(a) The manufacture, transportation, or storage of any product to be used in the preparation of the United States or any of the states for defense or for war or in the prosecution of war by the United States or in the rendering of assistance by the United States to any other nation in connection with that nation’s defense.

(b) The manufacture, transportation, distribution, or storage of gas, oil, coal, electricty, or water.

(c) The operation of any public utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1637.

If conduct prohibited by this chapter is also made unlawful by another law, the offender may be convicted for the violation of this chapter or of the other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1639.

This chapter shall not be construed:

(a) To impair, curtail, or destroy the right of employees and their representatives to self-organization, to form, join, or assist labor organizations, to bargain collectively through representatives of their own choosing, and to engage in concerted activities, for the purpose of collective bargaining or other mutual aid or protection.

(b) To impair, curtail, or destroy the rights of employees, former employees, and their representatives to strike.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1640.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 68.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Protection of Property Used for Defense Preparation [1650. - 1659.]

1650.

Any individual, partnership, association, corporation, municipal corporation, or the State or any of its political subdivisions engaged in, or preparing to engage in, defense preparation, whose property, except where it fronts on water or where there are entrances for railway cars, vehicles, persons, or things, is enclosed, may post around its property at each gate, entrance, dock, or railway entrance and every 100 feet of water front a sign reading “no entry without permission.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1651.

Any person who without permission of the owner wilfully enters upon any premises posted pursuant to Section 1650 is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1652.

Any peace officer or any person employed as a security guard or in a supervisory capacity on premises posted pursuant to Section 1650 may stop any person found on the premises and may detain that person for the purpose of demanding their name, address, and the reason for the person’s presence. If the peace officer or employee has reason to believe that the person has no right to be on the premises, they may arrest the person without a warrant on the charge of violating Section 1651.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 107.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1653.

Any individual, partnership, association, corporation, municipal corporation, or the State or any of its political subdivisions engaged in or preparing to engage in defense preparation, who has property so used which he believes will be endangered if public use and travel is not restricted or prohibited on any abutting highway, may petition the highway commissioners of any city or county to close or to restrict the use of and travel upon any part of the abutting highway lying within 150 feet of such property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1654.

Upon receipt of a petition, the highway commissioners shall set a day for hearing and give notice thereof by publication pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in the city or county in which such property is located. Notice shall be given at least seven days prior to the date set for hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

1655.

If after hearing the highway commissioners determine that the public safety and the safety of the property of the petitioner require that public use and travel upon any abutting highway be closed or restricted within 150 feet or less of the property, they shall issue such an order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1656.

Appropriate notices in letters at least three inches high shall be posted conspicuously at each end of any highway so closed or restricted by such order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1657.

The highway commissioners may at any time revoke or modify any order so made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1658.

The highway commissioners may issue written permits to travel over the highways so closed or restricted to responsible and reputable persons for such term, under such conditions, and in such form as the commissioners prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1659.

Any person who violates any order made under Section 1655 is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 68.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Sabotage [1670. - 1674.]

1670.

Any person who intentionally and maliciously destroys, impairs, injures, interferes, or tampers with real or personal property with reasonable grounds to believe that such act will hinder, delay, or interfere with the preparation of the United States or of any of the states for defense or for war, or with the prosecution of war by the United States, or with the rendering of assistance by the United States to any other nation in connection with that nation’s defense, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1671.

Any person who intentionally and maliciously makes or causes to be made or intentionally and maliciously omits to note on inspection any defect in any article or thing with reasonable grounds to believe that such article or thing is intended to be used in connection with the preparation of the United States or any state for defense or for war, or for the prosecution of war by the United States, or with the rendering of assistance by the United States to any other nation in connection with that nation’s defense, or that such article or thing is one of a number of similar articles or things, some of which are intended so to be used, is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1672.

Any person who is guilty of violating Section 1670 or 1671 is punishable as follows:

(a) If the act or failure to act causes the death of any person, a person violating this section is punishable by death or imprisonment in the state prison for life without possibility of parole. The penalty shall be determined pursuant to the provisions of Sections 190.3 and 190.4 of the Penal Code. If the act or failure to act causes great bodily injury to any person, a person violating this section is punishable by life imprisonment without possibility of parole.

(b) If the act or failure to act does not cause the death of, or great bodily injury to, any
 person, the person violating this section is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for two, four, or six years, by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine. However, if a person so acts or so fails to act with the intent to hinder, delay, or interfere with the preparation of the United States or of any state for defense or for war, or with the prosecution of war by the United States, or with the rendering of assistance by the United States to any other nation in connection with that nation’s defense, the person is punishable by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for three, five, or seven years, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 226.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1673.

Any person who attempts to commit any of the crimes defined by this chapter is punishable as provided in Section 664 of the Penal Code, except that attempts to commit crimes defined by Sections 1670 and 1671 are punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for two, three or four years or by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both. In addition to the acts which constitute an attempt to commit a crime under the law of this state, the solicitation or incitement of another to commit any of the crimes defined by this chapter not followed by the commission of the crime, the collection or assemblage of any materials with the intent that they are to be used then or at a later time in the commission of such
 crime, or the entry, with or without permission, of a building, enclosure, or other premises of another with the intent to commit any such crime constitutes an attempt to commit such crime.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 227.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

1674.

If two or more persons conspire to commit any crime defined by this chapter, each is guilty of conspiracy and subject to the same punishment as if he had committed the crime which he conspired to commit, whether or not any act be done in furtherance of the conspiracy. The fact that any of his fellow conspirators has been acquitted, has not been arrested or convicted, is not amenable to justice, or has been pardoned or otherwise discharged before or after conviction does not constitute a defense or ground of suspension of judgment, sentence, or punishment for any person prosecuted under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 68.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Reinstatement of Public Officers After Military Service [1690. - 1693.]

1690.

Any elected officer of the state who is called to serve with the Armed Forces of the United States has a right to return to and to reenter upon their office after the termination of their active service with the Armed Forces if the term for which they are elected has not expired.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 152.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1691.

Upon their return and reentry or their return to the office they shall have all of the rights and privileges in, connected with, or arising out of, the office which they would have enjoyed if they had not been absent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 109.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1692.

Any vacancy created by such absence may be filled by a temporary appointment, as provided by law, for a term not to extend beyond the time of the return and reentry to the office by the absent person or beyond the term for which they are elected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 110.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1693.

If any such officer was required by law to file an oath of office or to execute a bond prior to their original entry upon the duties of the office, they shall file an oath and execute a bond in like manner and form prior to their reentry upon the duties of the office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 111.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 8. VETERANS' WELFARE [1800. - 1840.]



CHAPTER 1. Solicitation for Veterans’ Benefits [1800. - 1802.]

1800.

As used in Section 1801:

(a) “Veterans’ organizations” means any duly congressionally recognized or chartered organization of honorably discharged members of the Armed Forces of the United States, or any of their auxiliaries, including, but not limited to, the Air Force Sergeants Association, American Ex-Prisoners of War, American Legion, American Veterans, Armed Forces Retirees Association of California, Association of the United States Army, Blinded Veterans Association, California Association of County Veterans Service Officers, California State Commanders Veterans Council, Disabled American Veterans, Fleet Reserve Association, Jewish War Veterans, Legion of Valor, Marine Corps League, Military Officers Association of America, Military Order of the Purple Heart, National Association for Uniformed Services, Paralyzed Veterans of America, Reserve Officers Association, Retired Enlisted Association, Veterans of Foreign Wars, Vietnam Veterans of America, or WAVES National.

(b) “Poppy” means any article fashioned of cloth, paper, or other material which represents or resembles the poppy or other flower.

(c) “Badge” means any badge, rosette, lapel button, or other insignia of any veterans’ organization or any imitation thereof.

(d) “Label” means any card, paper, sign, certificate, banner, or other material containing the name of or a similar name to that of any veterans’ organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 206, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1801.

It is unlawful for any person to do any of the following acts:

(a) To hawk, peddle, vend, offer to sell, give away, or offer to give away any poppy, badge, or label, which appears to be, or is represented directly or indirectly as being, sponsored, endorsed, or offered by any veterans’ organization, when such poppy, badge, or label is not so sponsored, endorsed, or offered by any veterans’ organization.

(b) To represent in any way, directly or indirectly, that any poppy, badge, or label is sponsored, endorsed, or is being offered by a veterans’ organization when it is in fact not so sponsored, endorsed, or offered by that veterans’ organization.

(c) To represent in any way, directly or indirectly that any act of solicitation of the contribution of funds or property or for the purchase or sale of any merchandise or services is sponsored, endorsed, or made by or at the request of a veterans’ organization when it is not in fact so sponsored, endorsed, or made by that veterans’ organization.

(d) To manufacture, process, assemble or distribute, or offer for sale, any poppy, badge, or label which appears to be, or is represented directly or indirectly as being, sponsored, endorsed, or offered by any veterans’ organization, when such poppy, badge, or label is not so sponsored, endorsed, or offered by any veterans’ organization.

Any person, whether or not an honorably discharged member of the Armed Forces of the United States, and whether or not licensed to hawk, peddle, or vend goods, wares, or merchandise, who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 206, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1802.

Any person who solicits funds for the benefit of any veteran or veterans’ association and who uses such funds for purposes other than those represented in the solicitation is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 68.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Veterans’ Organizations and Insignia [1820. - 1821.]

1820.

(a) Any person who willfully wears or uses the badge, lapel button, rosette, or other recognized and estimable insignia of the veterans’ organizations specified in subdivision (a) of Section 1800, unless they are entitled to wear or use it under the rules and regulations and with the express permission of the veterans’ organizations specified in subdivision (a) of Section 1800, is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable for a first conviction by imprisonment for a term not to exceed 30 days in the county jail, or a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500), except that if the person has been previously convicted of a violation of this section, that conviction shall be specified in the accusation and
 if found to be true or admitted by the person, a second or succeeding violation of this section is punishable by imprisonment not to exceed six months in the county jail, or a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both fine and imprisonment.

(b) Nothing in this section shall preclude prosecution for violation of any other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 112.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1821.

A person who falsely represents themself in a manner specified in Section 532b of the Penal Code shall be guilty of a misdemeanor or infraction, as prescribed by Section 532b of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 113.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Prisoners of War and Missing in Action [1830. - 1831.]

1830.

In enacting this chapter, the Legislature recognizes all of the following:

(a) California citizens have fought for their nation in many wars.

(b) Hundreds of Californians who served in those wars were captured by the enemy or are missing in action.

(c) Two hundred forty-three Californians who served in the Vietnam War remain unaccounted for.

(d) Nine hundred family members of Vietnam era POW/MIAs reside in California. 

(e) The uncertain fate of the 2,400 American citizens still held as POWs or listed as missing in action causes their families acute hardship and pain.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 943, Sec. 1.   Effective September 16, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1831.

(a) So that the people of California will not forget the sacrifices of those members of the United States Armed Forces who, after the termination of hostilities, remain prisoners of war or are missing in action, as well as the sacrifices of missing United States nonmilitary personnel and civilians, the Governor shall annually proclaim the third Friday of September to be known as Prisoner-of-War/Missing-in-Action (POW/MIA) Recognition Day.

(b) The flag of the National League of POW/MIA Families (POW/MIA Flag) is a black and white banner symbolizing those members of the United States Armed Forces who are listed as POW or MIA. The flag serves as a powerful reminder to people everywhere of our country’s firm resolve to achieve the
 fullest possible accounting for every member of the United States Armed Forces, and United States nonmilitary personnel and civilians. The flag shall be flown during business hours, at all state-owned buildings or facilities where the United States Flag and the California State Flag fly, if the flag can be attached to existing flagpoles or other existing structures on which the United States Flag or California Flag fly. The state may accept donations of POW/MIA Flags and related materials.

(c) The flag shall be flown at the Vietnam Veterans Memorial located on the grounds of the State Capitol whenever the United States Flag is flown at that location.

(d) Additionally, the Governor and the Legislature are authorized and requested to issue proclamations calling upon the people, schools, and local governments of California to recognize POW/MIA Recognition Day with appropriate
 ceremonies and activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 47, Sec. 1.   (SB 369)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Veterans In State Prison [1840. - 1840.]

1840.

The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall develop guidance policies relative to the release of veterans who are inmates. The policies shall be developed with the intent to assist veterans who are inmates in pursuing claims for federal veterans’ benefits, or in establishing rights to any other privilege, preference, care, or compensation provided under federal or state law because of honorable service in the military. In developing the policies, the department may coordinate with the Department of Veterans Affairs and the county veterans service officer or veterans service organizations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   (AB 2490)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

